apertium-tki.tki.twol
Alphabet

آ ا أ إ ب پ ت ث ج چ ح خ د ذ ر ز س ش ص ض ط ظ ع غ ف ق ك گ ل م ن و وو ؤ ه ى ێ ي ە
 ی   




%{ğ%}:غ
%{G%}:گ
%{K%}:ق
%{A%}:ا ! it could be {إ, آ, أ}
%{E%}:إ
%{D%}:د
%{L%}:ل ! for passive {ن}
%{C%}:چ
%{i%}:0 %{i%}:ي %{i%}:و %{i%}:ى
%{I%}:ی %{I%}:و !it could be {إ,و,ى,ي}
%{U%}:و ! it could be {إ,و}
%{u%}:0 %{u%}:و
%{s%}:0 %{s%}:س
%{n%}:0 %{n%}:ن
%{a%}:0 %{a%}:ا
%{e%}:0
!%{y%}:ی !%{y%}:ی !%{y%}:ى
%{N%}:0 %{N%}:ن %{N%}:ي
%{ü%}:أو
%{P%}:ب
%{T%}:ت %{T%}:د
%>:0 ;

Sets
Consonant = ب ت ث ج چ ح خ ر د ذ ر زس ش ص ض ط ظ ع غ ف ق ق ك گ ل م ن و ه ي ; ! ى ;
Vowel = ێ ا و ؤ وو ی ە ; !    
ShortVow = و ا ی ه ; 
LongVow = ێ  ؤ وو ; 
Nasal= م ن ;
BackVow = و ا ;  ! FIXME
BackCons = ق ق ع غ ;

!ا=:a !ه:ɛ !و=‎u !ؤ=oː !وو=:u !ی=iː !ێ=eː

  

Rules 

"Consonant alternation in passive"
%{L%}:ن <=>  [ :Vowel | :0* ]  %>: %{i%}: _ ; 
             [ %{e%}: | :ل | :0* ]  %>: %{i%}: _ ; 


"I becomes و when last vowel is و in a word"
%{I%}:و <=> [ :و :Consonant [ :Consonant | %{y%}: ]* ]/:0* _ ;
        except
            :إ :ی :و %>: %{n%}: _ ;

!"I becomes ی when last vowel is و in a word"
!%{I%}:و <=> [ :ى :Consonant :Consonant* ]/:0* _ ;

"realize {s} as س if after morpheme-final vowel "
%{s%}:س <=> :Vowel :0* _ ;


"realize {n} as n if it is before locative case and accusative case "
%{n%}:ن <=> _ %>: %{D%}: ;
            _ %>: %{y%}: ;
            [ :Vowel - %{y%}: ] %>: _ ;  ! at beginning of genitive after a vowel or n
        except
            :إ :ی :و %>: _ ;

"realize {y} as ي after a morpheme-final vowel "
%{y%}:ی <=> :Vowel :0* _ ;
            _ %>: %{n%}: ; ! in genitive case in a few words

"realize {D} as n between nasal codas"
%{D%}:ن <=> :Nasal :0* _ :Vowel* :Nasal ;

"{a} is realised as ا after back vowel"
%{a%}:ا <=> :BackVow [ :Consonant | %>: ]* _ ;

"{T} is realised as د between vowels"
%{T%}:د <=> _ %>:* [ :Vowel | %{a%}: ] ;

"intervocalic lenition at morpheme boundaries"
پ:ب <=> :Vowel _ (%{y%}:) %>: (:0*) :Vowel ;


! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
